Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-401.02
Act; how construed.

Nothing in the Uniform Controlled Substances Act shall be construed as authority for a practitioner to perform an act for which he or she is not authorized by the laws of this state.

Laws 2001, LB 398, § 3.